Colorado, session 2026A, HB1123.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 17-26-103.5 as
follows:
17-26-103.5. Strip searches in jails - definitions - repeal.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY" MEANS A COUNTY JAIL AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 17-26-101 OR MUNICIPAL JAIL AS DESCRIBED IN
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 31-15-401 (1)(j).
(b) "PERSONNEL" MEANS A PEACE OFFICER, NONCERTIFIED DEPUTY
SHERIFF, OR EMPLOYEE OR CONTRACTOR OF A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY
OR MUNICIPAL AGENCY WHO IS AUTHORIZED BY FACILITY OR AGENCY POLICY
TO PERFORM A STRIP SEARCH.
(c) "STRIP SEARCH" MEANS HAVING A PERSON REMOVE OR ARRANGE
SOME OR ALL OF THEIR CLOTHING SO AS TO PERMIT A VISUAL INSPECTION OF
THE GENITALS, BUTTOCKS, ANUS, OR FEMALE BREASTS OF THE PERSON.
(2) PERSONNEL SHALL ONLY CONDUCT A STRIP SEARCH ON A PERSON
WHO IS DETAINED IN A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY IF:
(a) THE LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY IS CONDUCTING AN INTAKE OF
A PERSON DETAINED IN A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY FROM OUTSIDE THE
FACILITY AND CONDUCTING STRIP SEARCHES UPON INTAKE FROM OUTSIDE
THE FACILITY IS THE LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY'S POLICY;
(b) TWO PERSONNEL HAVE DETERMINED AND REASONABLY BELIEVE
AN INMATE IS CONCEALING ON THE INMATE'S PERSON A CONTROLLED
SUBSTANCE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-18-102 (5); A DANGEROUS
INSTRUMENT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-8-203 (4); OR CONTRABAND, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 18-8-204 (2); OR
(c) THE STRIP SEARCH OCCURS UNDER A CIRCUMSTANCE OR SET OF
CONDITIONS IN WHICH THERE HAS BEEN A DOCUMENTED PRIOR INCIDENT OF
POSSESSION OF A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
18-18-102 (5); A DANGEROUS INSTRUMENT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-8-203
(4); OR CONTRABAND, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-8-204 (2); OR ANY OTHER
ITEM THAT CREATES GRAVE DANGER OF DAMAGE TO PROPERTY OR INJURY
TO PERSONS AND SUBSTANTIALLY OBSTRUCTS THE PERFORMANCE OF
INSTITUTIONAL FUNCTIONS OF THE LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY, AND THE
CIRCUMSTANCE OR SET OF CONDITIONS GIVE RISE TO A SUBSTANTIAL
LIKELIHOOD THAT A SIMILAR INCIDENT MAY OCCUR AGAIN, AND THE LOCAL
DETENTION FACILITY HAS A WRITTEN POLICY AUTHORIZING A STRIP SEARCH
UNDER THE CIRCUMSTANCE OR SET OF CONDITIONS.
(3) (a) PERSONNEL CONDUCTING A STRIP SEARCH PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2)(b) OR (2)(c) OF THIS SECTION SHALL DOCUMENT IN A
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1123

REPORT THE REASON FOR THE STRIP SEARCH AND THE RESULTS OF THE STRIP
SEARCH.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (3) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2031.
(4) (a) PERSONNEL CONDUCTING A STRIP SEARCH SHALL RECORD THE
STRIP SEARCH VIA BODY-WORN CAMERA. PERSONNEL CONDUCTING A STRIP
SEARCH SHALL NOTIFY THE PERSON THAT THEY ARE STRIP SEARCHING PRIOR
TO BEGINNING A STRIP SEARCH THAT THE STRIP SEARCH IS BEING VIDEO
RECORDED.
(b) PERSONNEL SHALL USE THE BODY-WORN CAMERA'S TAGGING
FUNCTION TO TAG ALL STRIP SEARCH FOOTAGE AS A STRIP SEARCH.
(5) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 OF EACH YEAR, EACH LOCAL
DETENTION FACILITY SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE JAIL STANDARDS
ADVISORY COMMITTEE CREATED IN SECTION 30-10-530 AND THE COLORADO
ATTORNEY GENERAL STATING THE NUMBER OF STRIP SEARCHES THAT
OCCURRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(b) OR (2)(c) OF THIS SECTION IN
THE FACILITY IN THE LAST CALENDAR YEAR AND THE REASON FOR AND THE
RESULT OF EACH STRIP SEARCH.
(6) SECTION 16-3-405 DOES NOT APPLY TO STRIP SEARCHES
CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(7) A STRIP SEARCH MUST NOT BE CONDUCTED FOR PURPOSES OF
RETALIATION.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 17-26-141 as
follows:
17-26-141. Access to jail video recordings showing prisoner
nudity - when authorized - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY" MEANS A COUNTY JAIL AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 17-26-101 OR MUNICIPAL JAIL AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 31-15-401 (1)(j).
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1123

(b) "STRIP SEARCH" MEANS HAVING A PERSON REMOVE OR ARRANGE
SOME OR ALL OF THEIR CLOTHING SO AS TO PERMIT A VISUAL INSPECTION OF
THE GENITALS, BUTTOCKS, ANUS, OR FEMALE BREASTS OF THE PERSON.
(2) PERSONNEL OF A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY WHO CONDUCT
STRIP SEARCHES SHALL TAG BODY-WORN CAMERA FOOTAGE OF STRIP
SEARCHES WITH A STRIP SEARCH TAG USING THE BODY-WORN CAMERA'S
TAGGING FEATURE.
(3) PERSONNEL OF A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY SHALL NOT RECORD
A STRIP SEARCH USING AN OVERHEAD CAMERA OR RECORDING DEVICE OTHER
THAN A BODY-WORN CAMERA.
(4) WHILE NOT ON THE PREMISE OF A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY,
PERSONNEL OF A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY SHALL NOT ACCESS VIDEO
FOOTAGE OF STRIP SEARCHES CAPTURED BY A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY.
(5) PERSONNEL OF A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY MUST OBTAIN
WRITTEN APPROVAL FROM THE SHERIFF OR EQUIVALENT HEAD OF A
MUNICIPAL JAIL, OR THE SHERIFF'S OR EQUIVALENT HEAD OF A MUNICIPAL
JAIL'S DESIGNEE, AND DOCUMENT WHAT VIDEO FOOTAGE THEY ARE
ACCESSING AND THE REASON THEY ARE ACCESSING IT BEFORE ACCESSING
ANY FOOTAGE OF STRIP SEARCHES CAPTURED IN A LOCAL DETENTION
FACILITY. WHEN A SHERIFF OR EQUIVALENT HEAD OF A MUNICIPAL JAIL IS
ACCESSING STRIP SEARCH FOOTAGE CAPTURED IN A LOCAL DETENTION
FACILITY, THEY MUST DOCUMENT WHAT FOOTAGE THEY ARE ACCESSING AND
THE REASON THEY ARE ACCESSING IT.
(6) THIS SECTION IS NOT APPLICABLE TO DISCOVERY OF VIDEO
RECORDINGS OR THE USE OF VIDEO RECORDINGS BY PARTIES IN A CIVIL,
CRIMINAL, OR ADMINISTRATIVE COURT CASE, OR AN INTERNAL
INVESTIGATION OR IN RESPONSE TO REQUESTS MADE PURSUANT TO SECTION
24-72-303.
(7) EACH LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY SHALL HAVE WRITTEN
POLICIES REGARDING:
(a) THE CIRCUMSTANCES OR SET OF CONDITIONS WHEN PERSONNEL
OF THE LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY ARE AUTHORIZED TO CONDUCT STRIP
SEARCHES OF PERSONS IN THE CUSTODY OF THE LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY;
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1123

(b) THE RESTRICTION OF ACCESS TO BODY-WORN CAMERA FOOTAGE
TAGGED AS STRIP SEARCH VIDEO PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(c) THE RETENTION OF BODY-WORN CAMERA FOOTAGE TAGGED AS
STRIP SEARCH VIDEO.
(8) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2026, EACH SHERIFF SHALL
IMPLEMENT THE WRITTEN POLICIES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (7) OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 17-26-142 as
follows:
17-26-142. Sexual assault prevention program - required policies
and procedures - audit required - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY" MEANS A COUNTY JAIL AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 17-26-101 OR MUNICIPAL JAIL AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 31-15-401 (1)(j).
(b) "PRISON RAPE ELIMINATION ACT" OR "PREA" MEANS THE
FEDERAL "PRISON RAPE ELIMINATION ACT OF 2003", 34 U.S.C. SEC. 30301
ET SEQ.
(c) "SEXUAL ABUSE" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS "SEXUAL
VIOLENCE" AS DEFINED IN SECTION 13-14-101.
(2) EACH LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY SHALL DEVELOP POLICIES AND
PROCEDURES TO:
(a) REQUIRE STAFF MEMBERS TO REPORT SUSPECTED, ALLEGED, OR
WITNESSED SEXUAL ABUSE;
(b) ESTABLISH PROTOCOLS FOR STAFF MEMBERS TO RESPOND TO
SUSPECTED, ALLEGED, OR WITNESSED SEXUAL ABUSE, WHICH PROTOCOLS
MUST INCLUDE PROTECTING THE VICTIM FROM IMMEDIATE HARM;
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1123

CONNECTING THE VICTIM WITH MEDICAL CARE; PRESERVING EVIDENCE OF
THE SUSPECTED, ALLEGED, OR WITNESSED OFFENSE; AND REPORTING THE
ALLEGED SEXUAL ABUSE;
(c) INFORM PRISONERS OF THEIR RIGHTS ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
THE FEDERAL "PRISON RAPE ELIMINATION ACT";
(d) INFORM PRISONERS UPON BOOKING, IN WRITING AND IN AN
ACCESSIBLE LANGUAGE, OF RESOURCES FOR VICTIMS OF SEXUAL ABUSE,
INCLUDING THE TELEPHONE NUMBER FOR A SEXUAL ASSAULT CRISIS LINE
AND THE MAILING ADDRESS OF THE NEAREST OR OTHER REASONABLY
ACCESSIBLE CONFIDENTIAL SEXUAL ASSAULT ADVOCACY PROGRAM; AND
(e) ALLOW CONFIDENTIAL SEXUAL ASSAULT ADVOCATES TIMELY
ACCESS TO PRISONERS WHO HAVE REACHED OUT TO A CONFIDENTIAL SEXUAL
ASSAULT ADVOCACY PROGRAM FOR ADVOCACY SERVICES.
(3) (a) EACH LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY SHALL DESIGNATE A STAFF
MEMBER AS THE JAIL'S PREA COORDINATOR. THE PREA COORDINATOR
SHALL, PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-3-1901.5, IMPLEMENT FEDERAL PREA
STANDARDS AS REQUIRED BY THE LEGISLATIVE OVERSIGHT COMMITTEE FOR
COLORADO JAIL STANDARDS AND SHALL FACILITATE ACCESS TO
CONFIDENTIAL SEXUAL ASSAULT ADVOCACY SERVICES FOR INMATES
SEEKING CONFIDENTIAL SEXUAL ASSAULT ADVOCACY SERVICES.
(b) THE JAIL SHALL INFORM STAFF MEMBERS AND PRISONERS OF THE
NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE PREA COORDINATOR AND
MAKE THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF THE PREA COORDINATOR
AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 17-26-143 as
follows:
17-26-143. Retaliation against whistleblower jail staff prohibited
- private right of action - exemptions - procedures - definitions.
(1) (a) A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY SHALL NOT DISCHARGE,
DISCIPLINE, DEMOTE, DENY A PROMOTION TO, TRANSFER OR REASSIGN,
DISCRIMINATE AGAINST, HARASS, SUSPEND, CREATE A HOSTILE WORK
ENVIRONMENT FOR, SUBJECT TO CORRECTIVE ACTION OR REPRIMAND, ISSUE
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1123

AN EMPLOYMENT RATING THAT RESULTS IN THE LOSS OF PAY OR ADVERSELY
AFFECTS ELIGIBILITY FOR PROMOTION OR FOR AN ASSIGNMENT FOR, LAY OFF,
REDUCE WORK HOURS FOR, KNOWINGLY PROVIDE FALSE INFORMATION FOR
THE PURPOSE OF NEGATIVELY AFFECTING FUTURE EMPLOYMENT
OPPORTUNITIES FOR, OR THREATEN ANY ACTIONS AGAINST OR OTHERWISE
DISCRIMINATE AGAINST A STAFF MEMBER IN TERMS, CONDITIONS, OR
PRIVILEGES OF EMPLOYMENT BECAUSE THE STAFF MEMBER DISCLOSES
INFORMATION IN GOOD FAITH TO THE PROPER SUPERVISING AUTHORITY THAT
THE STAFF MEMBER REASONABLY BELIEVES SHOWS SUSPECTED, ALLEGED,
OR WITNESSED SEXUAL ABUSE OR SEX-BASED HARASSMENT IN THE LOCAL
DETENTION FACILITY.
(b) ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURES, INCLUDING SUSPENSION DURING
AN INVESTIGATION OR DEPARTMENTAL PROCEDURES USED TO DISTRIBUTE
ASSIGNMENTS OR DUTIES OR MEET THE OPERATIONAL NEEDS OF THE LOCAL
DETENTION FACILITY, DO NOT VIOLATE SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) A STAFF MEMBER WHO IN GOOD FAITH DISCLOSES INFORMATION
THAT THE STAFF MEMBER REASONABLY BELIEVES SHOWS SUSPECTED,
ALLEGED, OR WITNESSED SEXUAL ABUSE OR SEX-BASED HARASSMENT IN THE
LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY IS ENGAGING IN A PROTECTED ACTIVITY.
(d) THIS SUBSECTION (1) DOES NOT PREVENT A LOCAL DETENTION
FACILITY FROM COMPLYING WITH ANY DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS
REQUIRED BY LAW OR BY COURT RULE OR PROCEDURE.
(2) A STAFF MEMBER AGGRIEVED BY A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (1)
OF THIS SECTION HAS A PRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION AGAINST THE LOCAL
DETENTION FACILITY THAT VIOLATED SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION
AFTER THE STAFF MEMBER EXHAUSTS THE INTERNAL ADMINISTRATIVE
PROCEDURES PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (10) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) A STAFF MEMBER WHOSE PROTECTED ACTIVITY DESCRIBED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION WAS A CONTRIBUTING
FACTOR IN THE LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY'S ACTION DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION MAY BE AWARDED ALL RELIEF NECESSARY
TO MAKE THE STAFF MEMBER WHOLE, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO:
(a) (I) REINSTATEMENT, WITH THE SAME SENIORITY STATUS THAT
THE STAFF MEMBER WOULD HAVE HAD BUT FOR THE VIOLATION OF
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1123

SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE AMOUNT OF BACK PAY WITH INTEREST AT AN INTEREST RATE
SET BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE PURSUANT TO SECTION 13-21-101 (3) FOR
THE YEARS BACK PAY IS AWARDED;
(b) ANY OTHER EQUITABLE RELIEF THE COURT DEEMS APPROPRIATE;
(c) COMPENSATORY DAMAGES FOR OTHER PECUNIARY LOSSES,
EMOTIONAL PAIN AND SUFFERING, INCONVENIENCE, MENTAL ANGUISH, LOSS
OF ENJOYMENT OF LIFE, AND OTHER NONPECUNIARY LOSSES; AND
(d) REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES AND COSTS.
(4) ANY REQUEST FOR REINSTATEMENT OR FOR AN AWARD OF
REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES MUST BE MADE TO THE COURT AFTER A
JUDGMENT IS ENTERED IN FAVOR OF THE STAFF MEMBER. THE PARTIES ARE
ENTITLED TO A HEARING ON THE REQUEST PRIOR TO THE COURT'S
DETERMINATION.
(5) IT IS AN AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE TO AN ACTION BROUGHT
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IF THE LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY SHOWS BY
A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE THAT THE LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY
WOULD HAVE TAKEN THE ACTION THAT FORMS THE BASIS OF THE SUIT
AGAINST THE STAFF MEMBER BASED ON A LEGITIMATE NONRETALIATORY
BASIS.
(6) AN ACTION BROUGHT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IS NOT SUBJECT
TO THE "COLORADO GOVERNMENTAL IMMUNITY ACT", ARTICLE 10 OF TITLE
24.
(7) IF A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY ASSERTS THE AFFIRMATIVE
DEFENSE CREATED IN SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION, THE STAFF MEMBER
MUST HAVE THE OPPORTUNITY TO ESTABLISH IN RESPONSE, BY A
PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE, THAT THE LEGITIMATE
NONRETALIATORY BASIS WAS PRETEXTUAL.
(8) AN ACTION BROUGHT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MUST BE
BROUGHT WITHIN TWO YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF THE MOST RECENT
ADVERSE EMPLOYMENT ACTION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1123

SECTION.
(9) (a) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A STAFF MEMBER WHO
DISCLOSES INFORMATION THAT THE STAFF MEMBER KNOWS TO BE FALSE,
WHO DISCLOSES INFORMATION WITH DISREGARD FOR THE TRUTH, OR WHO
DISCLOSES INFORMATION WITHOUT FULLY COMPLYING WITH SUBSECTION
(10) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) A STAFF MEMBER'S DISCLOSURE OF THE STAFF MEMBER'S OWN
ACT OF NEGLIGENCE, UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT, OR VIOLATION OF ANY
LOCAL, STATE, OR FEDERAL LAW IS NOT AN ACTIVITY PROTECTED PURSUANT
TO THIS SECTION AND DOES NOT PROVIDE THE STAFF MEMBER WITH
IMMUNITY RELATED TO THE ACTIVITY SUBJECT TO THE DISCLOSURE.
(c) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PREVENT A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY
FROM TAKING DISCIPLINARY ACTION AGAINST A STAFF MEMBER FOR
REASONS OTHER THAN THOSE SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION.
(10) (a) WHEN MAKING A GOOD FAITH REPORT OR DISCLOSURE
PROTECTED BY THIS SECTION, A STAFF MEMBER SHALL FOLLOW THE
INTERNAL REPORTING AND INTERNAL ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURES OF THE
LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY, TO THE EXTENT THE PROCEDURES EXIST AND
ARE PROVIDED TO THE EMPLOYEE IN WRITING, AND SHALL EXHAUST THE
PROCEDURES PRIOR TO INITIATING A PRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION. IF THE INTERNAL REPORTING
PROCEDURE REQUIRES A STAFF MEMBER TO REPORT TO THE INDIVIDUAL WHO
ALLEGEDLY COMMITTED THE ACT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS
SECTION, THE PROCEDURE MUST PROVIDE AN ALTERNATIVE REPORTING
PROCEDURE. THE LIMITATIONS PERIOD DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (8) OF THIS
SECTION IS TOLLED UNTIL THE INTERNAL ADMINISTRATIVE PROCESS IS
COMPLETE.
(b) (I) A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY SHALL COMPLETE THE
INTERNAL ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE WITHIN ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY DAYS
AFTER A REPORT OR DISCLOSURE.
(II) IF A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY DOES NOT ADOPT AN INTERNAL
ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE OR DOES NOT COMPLETE THE INTERNAL
ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE WITHIN ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY DAYS AFTER A
REPORT OR DISCLOSURE, THIS SUBSECTION (10) IS DEEMED COMPLIED WITH
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1123

AND THE STAFF MEMBER MAY FILE A PRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION IN A COURT
OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS
SECTION. IF THE LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY'S INTERNAL ADMINISTRATIVE
PROCEDURE HAS NOT BEEN COMPLETED WHEN THE STAFF MEMBER INITIATES
A PRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION
FOR REASONS BEYOND THE CONTROL OF THE LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY,
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE EXISTENCE OF AN OPEN CRIMINAL
PROCEEDING OR AN OPEN CRITICAL INCIDENT RESPONSE TEAM
INVESTIGATION, THE LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY MAY SEEK A STAY OF THE
PRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION PENDING RESOLUTION OF THE SOURCE OF THE
DELAY.
(11) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY" MEANS A COUNTY JAIL AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 17-26-101 OR MUNICIPAL JAIL AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 31-15-401 (1)(j).
(b) "PROPER SUPERVISING AUTHORITY" MEANS THE PERSON OR
DEPARTMENT DESIGNATED IN THE LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY TO
INVESTIGATE ALLEGATIONS OF INTERNAL MISCONDUCT. IF THE LOCAL
DETENTION FACILITY DOES NOT HAVE A POLICY DESIGNATING A PERSON OR
DEPARTMENT TO INVESTIGATE ALLEGATIONS OF MISCONDUCT, THE PROPER
SUPERVISING AUTHORITY IS THE HIGHEST-RANKING STAFF MEMBER IN THE
LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY.
(c) "STAFF MEMBER" MEANS A PERSON ASSIGNED TO OR EMPLOYED
AT A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-904, amend
(1)(a)(IV) and (1)(a)(V); and add (1)(a)(VI) and (7) as follows:
24-31-904. Peace officer certification discipline - definition.
(1) (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law, the P.O.S.T. board
shall permanently revoke a peace officer's certification if:
(IV) An administrative law judge, hearing officer, or internal
investigation finds that a peace officer failed to intervene pursuant to
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1123

section 18-8-805 (5) and the incident resulted in death to another person; or
(V) An administrative law judge, hearing officer, or internal
investigation finds that a peace officer violated section 18-8-805 (1) or
(2)(a)(I) and the incident resulted in death to another person; OR
(VI) AN ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE, HEARING OFFICER, OR
INTERNAL INVESTIGATION FINDS THAT A PEACE OFFICER PERPETRATED AN
ACT THAT CONSTITUTES SEXUAL ASSAULT, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION
18-3-402; UNLAWFUL SEXUAL CONTACT, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION
18-3-404; OR INVASION OF PRIVACY FOR SEXUAL GRATIFICATION, AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-3-405.6, AND THE ACT INVOLVED A PERSON IN THE
CUSTODY OF A LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY.
(7) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "LOCAL DETENTION FACILITY" MEANS A COUNTY JAIL AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 17-26-101 OR MUNICIPAL JAIL AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 31-15-401 (1)(j).
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 30-10-511 as
follows:
30-10-511. Sheriff custodian of jail - duties - strip search footage
- repeal.
(1) Except as provided in section 16-11-308.5, C.R.S., the sheriff
shall have HAS charge and custody of the jails of the county, and of the
prisoners in the jails, and THE SHERIFF shall supervise them himself or
herself THE PRISONERS THEMSELF or through a deputy or jailer.
(2) (a) EACH SHERIFF SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE SHERIFF'S
BODY-WORN CAMERA VENDOR TO IMPLEMENT A TAG FOR STRIP SEARCHES IN
THE BODY-WORN CAMERA FOOTAGE TAGGING OPTIONS. EACH SHERIFF SHALL
ENSURE THAT STRIP SEARCH FOOTAGE HAS THE MOST RESTRICTIVE LEVEL OF
ACCESS AVAILABLE WITHIN THE SHERIFF'S BODY-WORN CAMERA SYSTEM.
THE SHERIFF AND JAIL PERSONNEL SHALL ONLY ACCESS STRIP SEARCH
FOOTAGE PURSUANT TO SECTION 17-26-141 (5).
(b) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2026, EACH SHERIFF SHALL
IMPLEMENT BODY-WORN CAMERA FOOTAGE TAGGING PURSUANT TO SECTION
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1123

17-26-141 (2).
(3) (a) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 OF EACH YEAR, EACH SHERIFF
SHALL REPORT DATA COLLECTED DURING THE PREVIOUS CALENDAR YEAR AS
DOCUMENTED IN THE REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 17-26-103.5 (3) TO THE
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE IN THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY IN A
MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE DIVISION.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (3) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 31, 2031.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-503, add
(1)(hh) as follows:
24-33.5-503. Duties of division - repeal.
(1) The division has the following duties:
(hh) (I) TO MAKE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE BY JANUARY 31 OF EACH
YEAR DATA SUBMITTED TO THE DIVISION PURSUANT TO SECTION 30-10-511
(3). THE DIVISION SHALL USE EXISTING OR FREELY AVAILABLE TECHNOLOGY
TO ACCOMPLISH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION (1)(hh).
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(hh) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE FEBRUARY 1,
2031.
SECTION 8. Appropriation. For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$38,916 is appropriated to the department of law. This appropriation is from
the P.O.S.T. board cash fund created in section 24-31-303 (2)(b), C.R.S.,
and is based on an assumption that the department will require an additional
0.3 FTE. To implement this act, the department may use this appropriation
for peace officers standards and training board support.
SECTION 9. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1123

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1123